Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [28A.154] RAW MILK SALES BY SMALL FARM PRODUCERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Licensing provisions; applicability. new text end new text begin The licensing provisions of sections 28A.01 to 28A.16 do not apply to an individual who cultivates and sells fluid raw milk or raw milk products, including milk, cream, skim milk, goat milk, sheep milk, cream, butter, cottage cheese, ice cream, yogurt, and aged and not aged raw milk cheese, if the following requirements are met: new text end new text begin (1) the individual who cultivates and sells fluid raw milk or raw milk products has a farm with less than 12 animal units. One animal unit consists of one mature cow, five mature goats, or five mature sheep; new text end new text begin (2) the fluid raw milk or raw milk products offered for sale under this subdivision are labeled to accurately reflect the name, registration number, and address of the individual or farm that cultivated the food, the date on which the food was produced, and the statement, "These are raw milk products that are not subject to state inspection."; and new text end new text begin (3) the individual who cultivates and sells fluid raw milk or raw milk products displays at the point of sale a clearly legible sign or placard stating, "These are raw milk products that are not subject to state inspection." new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Direct sales to consumers. new text end new text begin An individual qualifying for an exemption under subdivision 1 may sell exempt fluid raw milk or raw milk products: new text end new text begin (1) directly from the individual's home to the ultimate consumer, to the extent allowed by local ordinance; or new text end new text begin (2) directly to the ultimate consumer at a community event or farmers' market. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Registration. new text end new text begin (a) An individual who prepares and sells exempt fluid raw milk or raw milk products under subdivision 1 must register annually with the commissioner on forms approved by the commissioner. A tier one registration has no registration fee and covers raw milk and raw milk product sales of up to $5,000 per calendar year. A tier two registration has a $50 registration fee and covers raw milk and raw milk product sales totaling up to $78,000 in sales per calendar year. new text end new text begin (b) When registering with the commissioner, an individual must provide the commissioner with proof that: new text end new text begin (1) the individual completed a class on food safety, animal health, and safe milk handling that has been approved by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) all animals on the individual's farm tested negative for tuberculosis and brucellosis and a veterinarian administered all testing within 15 days of the registration request. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must register an individual within 30 days of receiving the individual's complete registration as long as the individual meets the requirements of this subdivision. new text end new text begin (d) An individual who is registered under this subdivision is not subject to the pasteurization requirements in section 32D.20. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 32D.20, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Pasteurization. No milk or fluid milk products shall be sold, offered or exposed for sale, or held in possession for sale for the purpose of human consumption in fluid form in this state unless the milk or fluid milk product has been pasteurized, as defined in section 32D.01, subdivision 15, and cooled, provided that this section shall not apply tonew text begin : (1)new text end milk, cream, or skim milk occasionally secured or purchased for personal use by a consumer at the place or farm where the milk is producednew text begin ; and (2) fluid raw milk and raw milk products sold by individuals registered under section 28A.154, subdivision 3new text end .